Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.070

Recording.

The conveyance shall be recorded in the office in which by law it should have been recorded had it been made by the parties whose title is conveyed by it.

[Code 1881 s 534; 1877 p 112 s 538; 1854 p 205 s 396; RRS s 611.]